en: Harps
xx: Harps
cs: Harfy
da: Harper
de: Harfen
es: Arpas
fr: Harpes
it: Arpe
ja: ハープ
nl: Harpen
no: Harper
pl: Harfy
pt: Harpas
ru: Арфы
sv: Harpor
tr: Arplar

en: Upright Basses
xx: Upright Basses
cs: Kontrabasy
da: Kontrabasser
de: Kontrabässe
es: Contrabajos
fr: Contrebasses
it: Contrabbassi verticali
ja: アップライトベース
nl: Staande bassen
no: Kontrabasser
pl: Kontrabasy
pt: Contrabaixos
ru: Контрабасы
sv: Kontrabaser
tr: Kontrbaslar

en: Violas
xx: Violas
cs: Violy
da: Bratscher
de: Bratschen
es: Violas
fr: Altos
it: Viole
ja: ビオラ
nl: Altviolen
no: Bratsjer
pl: Altówki
pt: Violas
ru: Альты
sv: Violor
tr: Viyolalar

en: Violins
xx: Violins
cs: Housle
da: Violiner
de: Violinen
es: Violines
fr: Violons, violon
it: Violini
ja: バイオリン
nl: Violen
no: Fioliner
pl: Skrzypce
pt: Violinos
ru: Скрипки
sv: Violiner
tr: Kemanlar

en: Woodwinds
xx: Woodwinds
cs: Dřevěné dechové nástroje
da: Blæserinstrumenter
de: Holzblasinstrumente
es: Instrumentos de viento madera
fr: Instruments à vent, instrument à vent
it: Strumenti a fiato
ja: 木管楽器
nl: Houten blaasinstrumenten
no: Treblåsere
pl: Instrumenty dęte drewniane
pt: Instrumentos de sopro de madeira
ru: Деревянные духовые инструменты
sv: Träblåsinstrument
tr: Nefesli Çalgılar

en: Bassoons
xx: Bassoons
cs: Fagoty
da: Fagotter
de: Fagotte
es: Fagots
fr: Bassons
it: Fagotti
ja: ファゴット
nl: Fagotten
no: Fagotter
pl: Fagoty
pt: Fagotes
ru: Фаготы
sv: Fagotter
tr: Fagotlar

en: Clarinets
xx: Clarinets
cs: Klarinety
da: Klarinetter
de: Klarinetten
es: Clarinetes
fr: Clarinettes
it: Clarinetti
ja: クラリネット
nl: Klarinetten
no: Klarinetter
pl: Klarnety
pt: Clarinetes
ru: Кларнеты
sv: Klarinetter
tr: Klarnetler

en: Flutes
xx: Flutes
cs: Flétny
da: Tværfløjter
de: Flöten
es: Flautas
fr: Flûtes, flûte
it: Flauti
ja: フルート
nl: Fluiten
no: Fløyter
pl: Flety
pt: Flautas
ru: Флейты
sv: Flöjter
tr: Flütler

en: Flutophones
xx: Flutophones
cs: Flutophony
da: Begynderblokfløjter
de: Kinderflöten
es: Flautas de plástico
fr: Tonettes
it: Flauti per bambini
ja: フルートフォン
nl: Fluitofoons
no: Blokkfløyter
pl: Flutofony
pt: Flautas de plástico
ru: Флейтофоны
sv: Flutophones
tr: Flutophone'lar

en: Harmonicas
xx: Harmonicas
cs: Harmoniky
da: Harmonikaer
de: Mundharmonikas
es: Armónicas
fr: Harmonicas
it: Armoniche
ja: ハーモニカ
nl: Harmonica's
no: Munnspill
pl: Harmonijki
pt: Gaitas
ru: Гармоники
sv: Munspel
tr: Mızıkalar

en: Jew's Harps
xx: Jew's Harps
cs: Brumle
da: Jødeharper
de: Maultrommeln
es: Arpas de boca
fr: Guimbardes
it: Marranzani
ja: 口琴
nl: Mondharpen
no: Munnharper
pl: Drumle
pt: Berimbau de boca
ru: Варганы
sv: Mungigor
tr: Ağız Tamburaları

en: Melodicas
xx: Melodicas
cs: Foukací klávesové harmoniky
da: Melodikaer
de: Melodicas
es: Melódicas
fr: Mélodicas
it: Melodica
ja: 鍵盤ハーモニカ
nl: Melodica's
no: Melodikaer
pl: Harmonijki klawiszowe
pt: Melódicas
ru: Мелодические гармоники
sv: Melodicas
tr: Melodikalar

en: Musical Pipes
xx: Musical Pipes
cs: Panovy flétny a dudy
da: Panfløjter
de: Längsflöten & Panflöten
es: Flautas de una mano
fr: Autres flûtes
it: Tubi sonori
ja: パンパイプ
nl: Panfluiten
no: Rørfløyter
pl: Inne instrumenty dęte drewniane
pt: Flautas peruanas
ru: Дудки
sv: Pipor
tr: Pan Flütler

en: Oboes & English Horns
xx: Oboes & English Horns
cs: Hoboje
da: Oboer
de: Oboen
es: Oboes
fr: Hautbois
it: Oboe
ja: オーボエ
nl: Hobo's
no: Oboer
pl: Oboje
pt: Oboés
ru: Гобои
sv: Oboer
tr: Obualar

en: Ocarinas
xx: Ocarinas
cs: Okaríny
da: Okarinaer
de: Okarinas
es: Ocarinas
fr: Ocarinas
it: Ocarine
ja: オカリナ
nl: Ocarina's
no: Okarinaer
pl: Okaryny
pt: Ocarinas
ru: Окарины
sv: Okarinor
tr: Okarinalar

en: Recorders
xx: Recorders
cs: Zobcové flétny
da: Optagere
de: Blockflöten
es: Flautas dulces
fr: Flûtes à bec
it: Flauti dolci
ja: リコーダー
nl: Blokfluiten
no: Opptakere
pl: Flety proste
pt: Flautas doces
ru: Блокфлейты
sv: Blockflöjter
tr: Blok Flütler

en: Saxophones
xx: Saxophones
cs: Saxofony
da: Saxofoner
de: Saxophone
es: Saxofones
fr: Saxophones, saxophone
it: Sassofoni
ja: サックス
nl: Saxofoons
no: Saksofoner
pl: Saksofony
pt: Saxofones
ru: Саксофоны
sv: Saxofoner
tr: Saksafonlar

en: Tin Whistles
xx: Tin Whistles
cs: Irské flétny
da: Blikfløjter
de: Blechflöten
es: Flautas irlandesas
fr: Flûtes irlandaises
it: Fischietti in latta
ja: ティンホイッスル
nl: Tinfluitjes
no: Blikkfløyter
pl: Flażolety
pt: Flautas de metal
ru: Вистлы
sv: Tin whistles
tr: Teneke Düdükler

en: Train Whistles
xx: Train Whistles
cs: Vlakové píšťaly
da: Togfløjter
de: Zugpfeife
es: Silbatos de tren
fr: Sifflets de train
it: Fischietti da capotreno
ja: トレインホイッスル
nl: Treinfluitjes
no: Togfløyter
pl: Gwizdki pociągu
pt: Apitos de trem
ru: Локомотивные гудки
sv: Ångvisslor
tr: Tren Düdükleri

en: Party & Celebration
xx: Party & Celebration
cs: Párty a oslavy
da: Fest og fejring
de: Party & Feiern
es: Fiestas y celebraciones
fr: Fêtes et soirées
it: Party e festeggiamenti
ja: パーティー・お祝い
nl: Feestelijke gelegenheden
no: Fest og feiring
pl: Przyjęcia i świętowanie
pt: Festas e comemorações
ru: Вечеринки и праздники
sv: Fest och firande
tr: Parti ve Kutlamalar